Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB763.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9 of the act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act, is amended to read:Section 9. Permit issuance and conditions.(a) The department shall have the power to grant a permit if it determines that the proposed project complies with the provisions of this act and the regulations adopted hereunder, and complies with all other applicable laws administered by the department[, the Pennsylvania Fish Commission] and any river basin commission created by interstate compact.(b) The department may impose such permit terms and 123456789101112131415161718192021 conditions regarding construction, operation, maintenance, inspection and monitoring of the project as are necessary to assure compliance with this act and other laws administered by the department[, the Pennsylvania Fish Commission] and any river basin commission created by interstate compact.(c) Permit issuance and conditions shall be in accordance with the following:(1) The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission shall have no authority or jurisdiction related to stream maintenance or clearing activities within this Commonwealth.(2) No approval or authorization from the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission shall be required for any stream maintenance or clearing activities conducted within this Commonwealth.(3) The department may not delegate its authority related to stream maintenance or clearing activities to the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission.(4) Nothing in this act shall be construed to prevent the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission from being involved in an advisory capacity with permits and plans regarding the construction or installation of new bridges or culverts.Section 2. Section 20 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 20. Enforcement orders.* * *(e) The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission may enforce stream maintenance or clearing activities in this Commonwealth only when there is a potential violation under 30 Pa.C.S. (relating to fish) due to a person not having a valid permit or conducting an activity that was not authorized by the permit. 20250HB0763PN0787 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission shall not find that a stream maintenance or clearing activity violates 30 Pa.C.S. if the stream maintenance or clearing activity is general maintenance of a bridge or culvert. The Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission shall not enforce a penalty for a violation under 30 Pa.C.S. until the Pennsylvania Fish and Boat Commission contacts the department and the relevant county conservation district to ensure that the stream maintenance or clearing activity was not authorized by a valid permit.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0763PN0787 - 3 - 12345678910